Maryland, session 2025, SB0908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–804.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0908*

SENATE BILL 908
(2) (I) “AUTOMATED ELECTRIC VEHICLE LOAD MANAGEMENT”
MEANS THE UTILIZATION OF A POWER CONTROL SYSTEM, AS DEFINED IN UL 3141,
TO LIMIT OR CONTROL CURRENT OR POWER TO STAY WITHIN SAFE, DEFINED LIMITS
THAT ARE CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH NATIONAL ELECTRICAL CODE
625.42 AND 750.30.
(II) “AUTOMATED ELECTRIC VEHICLE LOAD MANAGEMENT”
INCLUDES:
1. A SINGLE DEVICE USED TO CONTROL THE ELECTRIC
VEHICLE CHARGING LOAD; AND
2. MULTIPLE DEVICES OPERATING TOGETHER AS A
SYSTEM TO CONTROL THE ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING LOAD.
(3) “DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 7–1001 OF THIS TITLE.
(4) (I) “FLEXIBLE INTERCONNECTION” MEANS A METHOD FOR
CONNECTING DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM IN A MANNER THAT IS ADAPTABLE TO CHANGING CONDITIONS AND
OPTIMIZES THE USE OF EXISTING ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM
INFRASTRUCTURE.
(II) “FLEXIBLE INTERCONNECTION” INCLUDES THE USE OF AN
AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE CUSTOMER AND AN ELECTRIC COMPANY TO IMPLEMENT
THE USE OF A POWER CONTROL SYSTEM, AS DEFINED IN UL 3141, TO PREVENT A
CONSTRAINED PART OF THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM FROM EXCEEDING
EXISTING CAPACITY.
(5) “HOSTING CAPACITY” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF AGGREGATE
GENERATION THAT CAN BE ACCOMMODATED ON AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM OR AREA, OR A COMPONENT OF AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM,
WITHOUT REQUIRING INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADES.
(6) “LOAD FLEXIBILITY” MEANS A CHANGE IN THE AMOUNT OR
TIMING OF ENERGY USE TO SUPPORT ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM NEEDS.
(7) “NON–WIRES SOLUTION” MEANS ANY ELECTRICAL SYSTEM
INVESTMENT, PROGRAM, RATE, OR SERVICE THAT IS INTENDED TO DEFER OR
REMOVE THE NEED TO CONSTRUCT NEW OR UPGRADE EXISTING COMPONENTS OF A
DISTRIBUTION OR TRANSMISSION SYSTEM.

SENATE BILL 908 3
(8) “UL 3141” MEANS THE ELECTRICAL STANDARDS PUBLISHED BY
UL SOLUTIONS THAT DEFINES REQUIREMENTS FOR MATERIAL CONSTRUCTION,
PERFORMANCE, TESTING, AND INSTALLATION TO PROMOTE THE SAFETY AND
RELIABILITY OF POWER CONTROL SYSTEMS.
(9) “VIRTUAL POWER PLANT” MEANS A NETWORK OF MULTIPLE,
DECENTRALIZED, DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES INTEGRATED TO BALANCE
ENERGY SUPPLY AND DEMAND ON A LARGE SCALE.
[(a)] (B) On or before December 31, 2025, the Commission shall adopt
regulations or issue orders to:
(1) implement specific policies for electric system planning;
(2) require consideration of investment in, or procurement of, cost–effective
demand–side methods and technology to improve reliability and efficiency, including
virtual power plants; [and]
(3) implement specific policies for improvements in order to promote the
State’s policy goals under § 7–802 of this subtitle AND TO ACHIEVE THE STATE’S
TARGETS FOR THE EXPANSION OF:
(I) SOLAR ENERGY;
(II) BUILDING ELECTRIFICATION;
(III) ELECTRIC VEHICLES;
(IV) ENERGY STORAGE CAPACITY; AND
(V) REDUCTION OF GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS;
(4) REQUIRE EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY, EVERY 3 YEARS, TO SUBMIT
TO THE COMMISSION FOR APPROVAL AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN
THAT:
(I) INCLUDES THE INFORMATION REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION
(D) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (E)
OF THIS SECTION;
(5) ADOPT AND UPDATE AS NEEDED METRICS TO BE USED TO
MONITOR AN ELECTRIC COMPANY’S PROGRESS TOWARD IMPLEMENTING ITS

SENATE BILL 908
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN, INCLUDING METRICS ASSESSING THE
FOLLOWING CATEGORIES:
(I) SYSTEM RELIABILITY;
(II) INTEGRATION OF DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES,
INCLUDING SPECIFIC METRICS RELATED TO SOLAR ENERGY, ENERGY STORAGE,
AND ELECTRIC VEHICLES;
(III) ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM MANAGEMENT,
INCLUDING SPECIFIC METRICS RELATED TO:
1. AGGREGATE PEAK LOAD;
2. PEAK LOAD REDUCTION PROGRAMS;
3. TIME–OF–USE AND DYNAMIC PRICING PROGRAMS;
4. ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING PROGRAMS; AND
5. HOSTING CAPACITY STATUS AND EXPANSION;
(IV) USE OF NON–WIRES SOLUTIONS AND NONCAPITAL
INVESTMENTS AND THE RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN USING THESE SOLUTIONS AND
INVESTMENTS AND THE LONG–TERM SYSTEM CAPACITY;
(V) ADVANCEMENT OF STATE POLICY GOALS AND TARGETS
IDENTIFIED IN ITEM (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND ANY OTHER APPLICABLE STATE
GOALS AND TARGETS EFFECTIVE AT THE TIME OF THE PLANNING CYCLE;
(VI) FUTURE ELECTRIC SYSTEM CAPABILITY, INCLUDING:
1. ENERGY STORAGE FLEXIBILITY;
2. FLEXIBLE INTERCONNECTIONS; AND
3. LOCAL DEMAND RESPONSE; AND
(VII) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY’S PARTICIPATION IN, AND
FACILITATION OF, AN EFFECTIVE INFORMATION EXCHANGE PROCESS AS
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION;

SENATE BILL 908 5
(6) REQUIRE EACH GAS COMPANY THAT OPERATES WITHIN ANY
PORTION OF AN ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE AREA TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLANNING PROCESS TO
THE EXTENT NECESSARY FOR THE ELECTRIC COMPANY TO DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN
AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(7) (I) ADOPT AN INFORMATION SHARING FRAMEWORK FOR THE
BROAD EXCHANGE OF DATA BETWEEN ELECTRIC COMPANIES, GAS COMPANIES,
ELECTRICITY SUPPLIERS, AND THE PUBLIC THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) REQUIRE ALL ELECTRIC COMPANIES AND GAS COMPANIES
TO PARTICIPATE IN EXCHANGING DATA AS DESCRIBED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM.
[(b)] (C) The regulations adopted and orders issued under [subsection (a) of] this
section shall:
(1) [be developed with] ATTEMPT TO ENSURE UNIFORMITY IN
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLANNING WHILE GIVING DUE consideration
[given] to the inherent differences, individual circumstances, and available resources
among investor–owned electric companies, electric cooperatives, and municipal electric
utilities; and
(2) if determined necessary by the Commission, establish separate
requirements for investor–owned electric companies, electric cooperatives, and municipal
electric utilities.
(D) (1) AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN SUBMITTED TO THE
COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE FORECAST, AS
SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AND A LOAD FORECAST,
AS SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, FOR AT LEAST THREE
PLANNING HORIZONS, INCLUDING:
1. A SHORT–TERM FORECAST OF 1 TO 3 YEARS FROM THE
DATE OF PLAN SUBMISSION;
2. A MID–TERM FORECAST OF 4 TO 6 YEARS FROM THE
DATE OF PLAN SUBMISSION; AND
3. A LONG–TERM FORECAST OF 7 TO 10 OR MORE YEARS
FROM THE DATE OF PLAN SUBMISSION;

SENATE BILL 908
(II) AT LEAST TWO FORECAST SCENARIO ANALYSES
REFLECTING POSSIBLE FUTURE OUTCOMES TO SERVE AS A REFERENCE IN THE
DEVELOPMENT AND EVALUATION OF THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION PLAN,
INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST ONE SCENARIO REFLECTING THE
INVESTMENTS REQUIRED TO MEET THE STATE’S EXISTING CLEAN ENERGY AND
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION GOALS; AND
2. AT LEAST ONE SCENARIO REFLECTING A DEMAND FOR
ELECTRICITY BEYOND THE INCREASED LOAD ANTICIPATED IN RESPONSE TO THE
STATE TARGETS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B)(3) OF THIS SECTION;
(III) FOR EACH FORECAST SCENARIO INCLUDED IN A PLAN IN
ACCORDANCE WITH ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, AT LEAST ONE PORTFOLIO OF
INVESTMENTS AND PROGRAMS THAT REFLECT HOW THE ELECTRIC COMPANY
COULD MEET RELIABILITY NEEDS AND FORECAST DEMAND WHILE MINIMIZING
CAPITAL INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT TO THE GREATEST EXTENT POSSIBLE;
(IV) AN ANALYSIS OF THE HOSTING CAPACITY FOR DISTRIBUTED
ENERGY RESOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAICS;
2. ENERGY STORAGE;
3. ELECTRIC VEHICLES; AND
4. DEMAND RESPONSE AND CONTROLLABLE LOADS;
(V) AN ANALYSIS OF THE LOAD–SERVING CAPACITY FOR
DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES, INCLUDING:
1. ENERGY STORAGE;
2. ELECTRIC VEHICLES;
3. BUILDING ELECTRIFICATION; AND
4. DEMAND RESPONSE AND CONTROLLABLE LOADS;

SENATE BILL 908 7
(VI) AN ANALYSIS OF LOCATIONS WITHIN THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY’S SERVICE AREA WHERE THE EXPANSION OF DISTRIBUTED ENERGY
RESOURCES WILL PROVIDE THE GREATEST VALUE TOWARD MEETING DEMAND OR
PROVIDING NECESSARY ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM SERVICES;
(VII) AN ANALYSIS OF EXISTING CONSTRAINTS ON THE ABILITY
OF THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM TO:
1. EXPAND DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES;
2. MEET ANTICIPATED LOAD REQUIREMENTS; AND
3. ACHIEVE THE STATE’S CLEAN ENERGY AND
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION GOALS;
(VIII) AN ANALYSIS APPLYING THE STATE UNIFIED
BENEFIT–COST ANALYSIS FRAMEWORK TO POSSIBLE SOLUTIONS FOR ADDRESSING
THE CONSTRAINTS IDENTIFIED IN ITEM (VII) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, INCLUDING
NON–WIRES SOLUTIONS;
(IX) A LIST OF THE POSSIBLE SOLUTIONS IDENTIFIED IN ITEM
(VIII) OF THIS PARAGRAPH THAT HAVE BEEN SELECTED BY THE ELECTRIC COMPANY
TO BE IMPLEMENTED AND THE FACTORS THAT CONTRIBUTED TO EACH DECISION;
(X) A DESCRIPTION OF PLANS FOR THE INCORPORATION OF
INNOVATIONS AND TECHNOLOGIES TO INCREASE THE RELIABILITY AND RESILIENCE
OF, AND THE ABILITY TO EXPAND, MANAGE, AND MODERNIZE, THE ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM, INCLUDING:
1. AUTOMATED ELECTRIC VEHICLE LOAD
MANAGEMENT;
2. FLEXIBLE INTERCONNECTION;
3. CLEAN MICROGRIDS;
4. LOAD FLEXIBILITY;
5. ENERGY EFFICIENCY; AND
6. VIRTUAL POWER PLANTS;

SENATE BILL 908
(XI) A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE ELECTRIC COMPANY IS
COORDINATING ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM INVESTMENTS WITH ELECTRIC
TRANSMISSION SYSTEM PLANNING IN THE PJM REGION IN A MANNER THAT IS MOST
COST–EFFECTIVE TO RATEPAYERS;
(XII) A DESCRIPTION OF PLANS AND ACTIONS TAKEN TO
MINIMIZE THE COST TO RATEPAYERS THROUGH THE EFFECTIVE USE OF FEDERAL,
STATE, AND LOCAL RESOURCES AND INCENTIVES;
(XIII) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY OTHER ACTIONS TAKEN TO
MINIMIZE THE COST TO RATEPAYERS;
(XIV) A DESCRIPTION OF EFFORTS TO COORDINATE WITH GAS
COMPANIES TO IDENTIFY LOCATIONS FOR GAS DECARBONIZATION AND FACILITATE
ELECTRIFICATION TO MEET THE STATE’S CLIMATE GOALS, INCLUDING:
1. A DESCRIPTION OF EFFORTS TO COLLABORATE WITH
ANY GAS COMPANY WHOSE TERRITORY OVERLAPS WITH THAT OF THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY TO MODEL EACH COMPANY’S RESIDENTIAL AND COMMERCIAL
BUILDING–RELATED LOAD FORECASTS WITH THE PURPOSE OF ENSURING THAT
HEATING DEMAND IS NOT DOUBLE–COUNTED ACROSS SYSTEMS; AND
2. A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION PLAN ACCOUNTS FOR:
A. ANY GAS COMPANY EFFICIENCY; AND
B. ANY ELECTRIFICATION PROGRAMS OR NON–PIPELINE
ALTERNATIVES THAT IMPACT ELECTRICITY DEMAND;
(XV) A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE ELECTRIC COMPANY PLANS TO
MANAGE ITS DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE HOSTING CAPACITY IN A WAY THAT
INCLUDES:
1. ESTABLISHING THE MINIMUM AMOUNT OF RESERVE
CAPACITY FOR EACH FEEDER CIRCUIT, AS DETERMINED BY A CIRCUIT–SPECIFIC
ANALYSIS, TO MAXIMIZE THE CAPACITY AVAILABLE FOR ACTIVE DISTRIBUTED
ENERGY RESOURCE DEVELOPMENT;
2. DEVELOPING HOSTING CAPACITY MAPS THAT
FACILITATE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE PLANNING, INCLUDING:

SENATE BILL 908 9
A. IDENTIFYING AREAS WHERE INTERCONNECTION
COSTS WILL BE HIGHER OR LOWER THAN AVERAGE;
B. LISTING OTHER UPCOMING PROJECTS FOR SPECIFIC
CIRCUITS; AND
C. EXISTING FEEDER LOAD AND CAPACITY; AND
3. REVISING THE HOSTING CAPACITY ANALYSIS AND
HOSTING CAPACITY MAPS FREQUENTLY ENOUGH TO REFLECT THE ACTUAL
DEVELOPMENT OF DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES ON CIRCUITS;
(XVI) A DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM PLAN ACCOUNTS FOR AND CONTRIBUTES TO ACHIEVING THE STATE’S
CLEAN ENERGY AND CLIMATE GOALS, INCLUDING THE GOALS AND TARGETS
IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B)(3) OF THIS SECTION;
(XVII) AN ANALYSIS APPLYING EACH OF THE METRICS ADOPTED
BY THE COMMISSION UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(5) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(XVIII) A COMPILATION OF ANY OFFICIAL COMMENTS
RECEIVED THROUGHOUT THE DRAFTING AND REVIEW PROCESS ACCOMPANIED BY:
1. A DESCRIPTION OF WHERE THE COMMENT IS
INCORPORATED IN THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN; OR
2. A JUSTIFICATION FOR NOT INCORPORATING THE
COMMENT IN THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN.
(2) (I) THE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE FORECAST
INCLUDED IN AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I)
OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE A FORECAST FOR, AT A MINIMUM:
1. SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAICS;
2. ENERGY STORAGE;
3. ELECTRIC VEHICLES;
4. BUILDING ELECTRIFICATION; AND
5. DEMAND RESPONSE AND CONTROLLABLE LOADS.

SENATE BILL 908
(II) THE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE FORECAST SHALL
REFLECT THE ABILITY OF EACH RESOURCE FORECAST TO PROVIDE ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM SERVICES, INCLUDING:
1. BIDIRECTIONAL ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING; AND
2. AGGREGATION OF DISTRIBUTED ENERGY
RESOURCES.
(III) THE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE FORECAST SHALL
PREDICT DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE AND ELECTRIFICATION ADOPTION AND
RELATED IMPACTS, BOTH TEMPORALLY AND GEOGRAPHICALLY.
(3) (I) THE LOAD FORECAST INCLUDED IN AN ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL REFLECT EXPECTED CHANGES IN ELECTRICITY DEMAND
WITHIN THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM FOR:
1. THE 8,760 HOURLY LOAD VARIATION;
2. LOAD PATTERNS AT THE FEEDER;
3. THE ANTICIPATED AMOUNT AND GEOGRAPHIC
LOCATION OF EXPANSION OF DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES; AND
4. THE LOAD–MODIFYING CHARACTERISTICS FOR THE
DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES FORECAST UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(II) THE LOAD FORECAST SHALL TAKE INTO CONSIDERATION
AND INCLUDE A DESCRIPTION OF THE EXPECTED RATE OF DEVELOPMENT AND
ADOPTION OF THE DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCES FORECAST UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) IF AN ELECTRIC COMPANY DOES NOT HAVE THE FULL
FORECASTING CAPABILITY REQUIRED TO MEET THE FORECAST REPORTING
REQUIREMENTS OF THE FORECASTS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ELECTRIC COMPANY, IN ITS FIRST PLANNING CYCLE, MAY
INSTEAD SUBMIT A ROADMAP OF ACTIONS TO BRIDGE THE GAP BETWEEN CURRENT
FORECAST PROCESSES AND NECESSARY IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING A TIMELINE
FOR MEETING THE FORECAST REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.

SENATE BILL 908 11
(E) BEFORE SUBMITTING AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN TO
THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION, AN ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROVIDE
SPECIFIC OPPORTUNITIES FOR PUBLIC AND STAKEHOLDER PARTICIPATION
THROUGHOUT THE DRAFTING PROCESS, INCLUDING:
(1) THREE PUBLIC STATUS MEETINGS THAT ARE OPEN TO PUBLIC
AND STAKEHOLDER PARTICIPATION, SPREAD OUT OVER THE COURSE OF THE
DRAFTING PROCESS, DISCUSSING:
(I) PLAN, SCENARIO, FORECAST, AND TECHNOLOGY ADOPTION
ASSUMPTIONS;
(II) IDENTIFIED SYSTEM CONSTRAINTS AND NEEDS; AND
(III) THE PROGRESS ON THE DRAFT PLAN, INCLUDING
PROPOSED SOLUTIONS ACCOMPANIED BY A COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS AND ANY
ADDITIONAL CRITERIA USED TO SELECT THE SOLUTION;
(2) THE OPPORTUNITY FOR STAKEHOLDERS AND THE PUBLIC TO
PROVIDE WRITTEN FEEDBACK ON THE CURRENT DRAFT PLAN FOR THE 30 DAYS
FOLLOWING EACH PUBLIC MEETING; AND
(3) WITHIN 30 DAYS FOLLOWING A COMMENT PERIOD UNDER ITEM (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, PROVIDING A RESPONSE TO ALL COMMENTS SUBMITTED
DURING THE COMMENT PERIOD, INCLUDING:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF WHERE THE COMMENT IS
INCORPORATED IN THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN; OR
(II) A JUSTIFICATION FOR NOT INCORPORATING THE COMMENT
IN THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN.
(F) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY’S
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN SUBMITTED FOR APPROVAL.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE AN ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN UNLESS THE COMMISSION FINDS THAT:
(I) THE ELECTRIC COMPANY SATISFIED ALL OF THE PUBLIC
AND STAKEHOLDER ENGAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (E)
OF THIS SECTION;

SENATE BILL 908
(II) THE PROJECTED DISTRIBUTION ACTIVITIES AND
CORRESPONDING BUDGETS AFFORDABLY AND STRATEGICALLY BENEFIT OR
ADVANCE THE POLICY GOALS AND TARGETS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B)(3) OF
THIS SECTION;
(III) THE PLAN WILL COST–EFFECTIVELY ADVANCE APPLICABLE
STATE POLICY TO THE GREATEST EXTENT POSSIBLE;
(IV) THE PLAN HAS ADEQUATELY INCORPORATED NON–WIRES
SOLUTIONS AND OTHER NONCAPITAL INVESTMENTS; AND
(V) THE PLAN:
1. INCORPORATES STAKEHOLDER AND PUBLIC
COMMENTS RECEIVED DURING THE DRAFTING PROCESS; OR
2. PROVIDES A SUFFICIENT, EVIDENCE–BASED
JUSTIFICATION FOR WHY THE ELECTRIC COMPANY DID NOT INCORPORATE INTO
THE PLAN STAKEHOLDER OR PUBLIC COMMENTS RECEIVED DURING THE DRAFTING
PROCESS.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY REJECT AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
PLAN SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE COMMISSION FINDS THAT THE PLAN
FAILS TO:
(I) COST–EFFECTIVELY ADVANCE EACH APPLICABLE STATE
POLICY TO THE GREATEST EXTENT POSSIBLE; OR
(II) PRIORITIZE PASSING ON THE LOWEST COST TO
RATEPAYERS WHILE ENSURING FUTURE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM
CAPACITY AND RELIABILITY.
(G) (1) THE INFORMATION SHARING FRAMEWORK ADOPTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION SHALL ENSURE ACCURACY IN ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM FORECASTING AND ASSESSING ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM CAPACITY.
(2) THE INFORMATION SHARING FRAMEWORK SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE SECURE METHODS OF COMMUNICATING:
1. FOR GAS COMPANIES, THE GEOGRAPHIC POSITION OF
GAS SERVICES, MAINS, AND RELATED DISTRIBUTION EQUIPMENT ALONG WITH ANY

SENATE BILL 908 13
INFORMATION REGARDING THE AGE, MATERIAL, DIAMETER, AND CONDITION OF
PIPES; AND
2. FOR ELECTRIC COMPANIES, THE GEOGRAPHIC
POSITION OF ALL FEEDERS, SUBSTATIONS, AND RELATED EQUIPMENT, INCLUDING
THE AGE AND CONDITION OF THE EQUIPMENT; AND
(II) ADHERE TO ALL INDUSTRY–RECOMMENDED
CYBERSECURITY GUIDELINES.
(H) THE COMMISSION MAY STAGGER THE REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF
DIFFERENT ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLANS TO BE COMPLETED IN
DIFFERENT YEARS, PROVIDED EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY’S ELECTRIC
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN IS REVIEWED AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 3 YEARS.
(I) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL REQUIRE EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY TO
PROVIDE THE COMMISSION WITH A PROGRESS REPORT ON THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY’S PROGRESS TOWARDS IMPLEMENTING THE COMPANY’S APPROVED
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN.
(2) A PROGRESS REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF ALL ONGOING ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM–RELATED PROJECTS OR PROCESSES AND ANY PLANNED OR UPCOMING
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM–RELATED PROJECTS;
(II) AN ANALYSIS DOCUMENTING THE DECISION–MAKING
PROCESS FOR SELECTED ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM–RELATED PROJECTS
AND DESCRIBING ANY REJECTED ALTERNATIVES;
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF HOW EACH ONGOING AND UPCOMING
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM–RELATED PROJECT CONTRIBUTES TO MEETING
APPLICABLE STATE POLICY AND THE POLICY GOALS AND TARGETS SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (B)(3) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(IV) AN ANALYSIS OF THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S PROGRESS
TOWARD IMPLEMENTING ITS ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM PLAN USING EACH
OF THE METRICS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(5) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.

SENATE BILL 908